Utah statutes.
4-37-302.   Acquisition of aquatic animals for use in fee fishing facilities.

(1)  Live aquatic animals intended for use in fee fishing facilities may be purchased or acquired only from:

(a)  aquaculture facilities within the state that have a certificate of registration and health approval number;

(b)  public aquaculture facilities within the state that have a health approval number; or

(c)  sources outside the state that are health approved pursuant to Part 5.

(2) (a)  A person holding a certificate of registration for a fee fishing facility shall submit to the department an annual report of all live fish purchased or acquired.

(b)  The report shall contain the following information:

(i)  name, address, and certificate of registration number of the seller or supplier;

(ii)  number and weight by species;

(iii)  date of purchase or transfer; and

(iv)  name, address, and certificate of registration number of the receiver.

(c)  The report shall be submitted to the department before a certificate of registration is renewed or subsequent certificate of registration is issued.

